Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1415.01
Restraining order.

Whenever the board shall believe from evidence satisfactory to it that
any person has violated or is violating any provisions of the Motor Vehicle Industry Regulation Act, the
board may, in addition to any other remedy, bring an action in the name and
on behalf of the State of Nebraska against such person and any other person
concerned in or in any way participating in or about to participate in practices
or acts in violation of the
act to enjoin such person and such other person from continuing
the same. In any such action, the board may apply for and on due showing be
entitled to have issued the court's subpoena, requiring forthwith the appearance
of any defendant and the defendant's agent
and employees and the production of documents, books, and records as may appear
necessary for the hearing of such petition to testify and give evidence concerning
the acts or conduct of practices or things complained of in such application
for injunction. In such action an order or judgment may be entered awarding
such preliminary or final injunctions as may be proper.

Laws 1971, LB 768, § 18;

Laws 2010, LB816, § 70.